Florida, session 2026, SB1494.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âSection 627.6418, Florida Statutes, is amended 37 to read: 38 627.6418âCoverage for mammograms.â 39 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 40 (a)ââBI-RADSâ means the American College of Radiology 41 Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System. 42 (b)ââDiagnostic breast examinationâ means a medically 43 necessary imaging examination of the breast, including, but not 44 limited to, an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast 45 magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, which is used 46 to evaluate an abnormality that is seen or reasonably suspected 47 during a screening examination for breast cancer. For purposes 48 of this paragraph, the term âreasonably suspectedâ means the 49 screening examination evidences at least one observable sign of 50 a potential abnormality. 51 (c)ââIncreased riskâ means, in accordance with the National 52 Comprehensive Cancer Network, any one of the following 53 categories which enhances the likelihood that a woman may 54 develop breast cancer, including: 55 1.âHaving a known genetic predisposition or a pedigree 56 suggestive of a genetic predisposition for breast cancer. 57 2.âHaving a lifetime risk of breast cancer equal to or 58 greater than 20 percent as defined by models that include a 59 comprehensive family history, including first-, second-, and, 60 when relevant to the model, third-degree relatives. 61 3.âHaving previously received thoracic radiation between 10 62 and 30 years of age. 63 4.âBeing 35 years of age or older with a 5-year risk of 64 invasive breast cancer equal to or greater than 1.7 percent. 65 5.âHaving a lifetime risk equal to or greater than 20 66 percent based on a history of atypical ductal hyperplasia, 67 lobular carcinoma in situ, or atypical lobular hyperplasia. 68 6.âHaving heterogeneously or extremely dense breast tissue 69 as defined under the BI-RADS and based on a womanâs most 70 recently completed mammogram results. 71 (d)ââScreening mammogramâ means a radiologic examination 72 using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 73 including digital breast tomosynthesis mammography but not 74 including any diagnostic mammography imaging, for the purpose of 75 detecting any potential breast cancer, which examination results 76 in the production of at least two radiographic images of each 77 breast. 78 (e)ââSupplemental breast cancer screeningâ means an imaging 79 examination of the breast, including, but not limited to, breast 80 magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, contrast-enhanced 81 mammography, or molecular breast imaging, which is used to 82 screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or 83 suspected. 84 (2)(1)âA major medical or similar comprehensive An accident 85 or health insurance policy issued, amended, delivered, or 86 renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, must provide 87 all of the following minimum coverage in accordance with the 88 most recent applicable National Comprehensive Cancer Networkâs 89 Breast Cancer Screening and Diagnosis guidelines coverage for at 90 least the following: 91 (a)âA baseline mammogram for any woman who is 35 years of 92 age or older, but younger than 40 years of age. 93 (b)âA mammogram every 2 years for any woman who is 40 years 94 of age or older, but younger than 50 years of age, or more 95 frequently based on the patientâs physicianâs recommendation. 96 (c)âA screening mammogram every year for any woman who is 97 40 50 years of age or older. 98 (b)(d)âOne or more medically necessary screening mammograms 99 a year, based upon a physicianâs recommendation of a physician 100 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is 101 at an increased risk of developing for breast cancer because of 102 a personal or family history of breast cancer, because of having 103 a history of biopsy-proven benign breast disease, because of 104 having a mother, sister, or daughter who has or has had breast 105 cancer, or because a woman has not given birth before the age of 106 30. 107 (c)âOne medically necessary supplemental breast cancer 108 screening a year, based upon a recommendation of a physician 109 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is 110 at an increased risk of developing breast cancer. 111 (3)âA major medical or similar comprehensive health 112 insurance policy issued for an insured who has dense breast 113 tissue by itself in the absence of any evidence of an 114 abnormality or suspicious abnormality of the breast as defined 115 by BI-RADS is subject to the coverage requirements provided in 116 paragraphs (2)(b) and (c). 117 (4)âA major medical or similar comprehensive health 118 insurance policy is subject to this section after treatment for 119 any breast cancer is completed, even if the insured is in a 120 remission and surveillance period prior to any clinical 121 designation that the insured is in long-term remission or cured, 122 provided any examination conducted during such period does not 123 meet the definition of a diagnostic breast examination. 124 (5)(2)âExcept as provided in paragraph (1)(b), for 125 mammograms done more frequently than every 2 years for women 40 126 years of age or older but younger than 50 years of age, The 127 coverage required by paragraphs (2)(a) and (b) subsection (1) 128 applies, with or without a licensed treating physicianâs 129 physician prescription, if the insured obtains a screening 130 mammogram in an office, facility, or health testing service that 131 uses radiological equipment registered with the Department of 132 Health for breast cancer screening. The coverage is subject to 133 the deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to 134 outpatient visits, and is also subject to all other terms and 135 conditions applicable to other benefits. This section does not 136 affect any requirements or prohibitions relating to who may 137 perform, analyze, or interpret a screening mammogram or the 138 persons to whom the results of a screening mammogram may be 139 furnished or released. 140 (6)(3)âThis section applies does not apply to disability 141 income, specified disease, or hospital indemnity policies 142 providing major medical or similar comprehensive coverage or 143 benefits. 144 (7)(4)âEvery insurer subject to the requirements of this 145 section shall make available to the policyholder as part of the 146 application, for an appropriate additional premium, the coverage 147 required in this section without such coverage being subject to 148 the deductible or coinsurance provisions of the policy. 149 Section 2.âSection 627.6613, Florida Statutes, is amended 150 to read: 151 627.6613âCoverage for mammograms.â 152 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 153 (a)ââBI-RADSâ means the American College of Radiology 154 Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System. 155 (b)ââDiagnostic breast examinationâ means a medically 156 necessary imaging examination of the breast, including, but not 157 limited to, an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast 158 magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, which is used 159 to evaluate an abnormality that is seen or reasonably suspected 160 during a screening examination for breast cancer. For purposes 161 of this paragraph, the term âreasonably suspectedâ means the 162 screening examination evidences at least one observable sign of 163 a potential abnormality. 164 (c)ââIncreased riskâ means, in accordance with the National 165 Comprehensive Cancer Network, any one of the following 166 categories which enhances the likelihood that a woman may 167 develop breast cancer, including: 168 1.âHaving a known genetic predisposition or a pedigree 169 suggestive of a genetic predisposition for breast cancer. 170 2.âHaving a lifetime risk of breast cancer equal to or 171 greater than 20 percent as defined by models that include a 172 comprehensive family history, including first-, second-, and, 173 when relevant to the model, third-degree relatives. 174 3.âHaving previously received thoracic radiation between 10 175 and 30 years of age. 176 4.âBeing 35 years of age or older with a 5-year risk of 177 invasive breast cancer equal to or greater than 1.7 percent. 178 5.âHaving a lifetime risk equal to or greater than 20 179 percent based on a history of atypical ductal hyperplasia, 180 lobular carcinoma in situ, or atypical lobular hyperplasia. 181 6.âHaving heterogeneously or extremely dense breast tissue 182 as defined under the BI-RADS and based on a womanâs most 183 recently completed mammogram results. 184 (d)ââScreening mammogramâ means a radiologic examination 185 using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 186 including digital breast tomosynthesis mammography but not 187 including any diagnostic mammography imaging, for the purpose of 188 detecting any potential breast cancer, which examination results 189 in the production of at least two radiographic images of each 190 breast. 191 (e)ââSupplemental breast cancer screeningâ means an imaging 192 examination of the breast, including, but not limited to, breast 193 magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, contrast-enhanced 194 mammography, or molecular breast imaging, which is used to 195 screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or 196 suspected. 197 (2)(1)âA group, blanket, or franchise major medical or 198 similar comprehensive accident or health insurance policy 199 issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after 200 January 1, 2027, must provide all of the following minimum 201 coverage in accordance with the most recent applicable National 202 Comprehensive Cancer Networkâs Breast Cancer Screening and 203 Diagnosis guidelines coverage for at least the following: 204 (a)âA baseline mammogram for any woman who is 35 years of 205 age or older, but younger than 40 years of age. 206 (b)âA mammogram every 2 years for any woman who is 40 years 207 of age or older, but younger than 50 years of age, or more 208 frequently based on the patientâs physicianâs recommendation. 209 (c)âA screening mammogram every year for any woman who is 210 40 50 years of age or older. 211 (b)(d)âOne or more medically necessary screening mammograms 212 a year, based upon a physicianâs recommendation of a physician 213 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is 214 at an increased risk of developing for breast cancer because of 215 a personal or family history of breast cancer, because of having 216 a history of biopsy-proven benign breast disease, because of 217 having a mother, sister, or daughter who has or has had breast 218 cancer, or because a woman has not given birth before the age of 219 30. 220 (c)âOne medically necessary supplemental breast cancer 221 screening a year, based upon a recommendation of a physician 222 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is 223 at an increased risk of developing breast cancer. 224 (3)âA group, blanket, or franchise major medical or similar 225 comprehensive health insurance policy issued for an insured who 226 has dense breast tissue by itself in the absence of any evidence 227 of an abnormality or suspicious abnormality of the breast as 228 defined by BI-RADS is subject to the coverage requirements 229 provided in paragraphs (2)(b) and (c). 230 (4)âA group, blanket, or franchise major medical or similar 231 comprehensive health insurance policy is subject to this section 232 after treatment for any breast cancer is completed, even if the 233 insured is in a remission and surveillance period prior to any 234 clinical designation that the insured is in long-term remission 235 or cured, provided any examination conducted during such period 236 does not meet the definition of a diagnostic breast examination. 237 (5)(2)âExcept as provided in paragraph (1)(b), for 238 mammograms done more frequently than every 2 years for women 40 239 years of age or older but younger than 50 years of age, The 240 coverage required by paragraphs (2)(a) and (b) subsection (1) 241 applies, with or without a licensed treating physicianâs 242 physician prescription, if the insured obtains a screening 243 mammogram in an office, facility, or health testing service that 244 uses radiological equipment registered with the Department of 245 Health for breast cancer screening. The coverage is subject to 246 the deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to 247 outpatient visits, and is also subject to all other terms and 248 conditions applicable to other benefits. This section does not 249 affect any requirements or prohibitions relating to who may 250 perform, analyze, or interpret a screening mammogram or the 251 persons to whom the results of a screening mammogram may be 252 furnished or released. 253 (6)(3)âEvery insurer referred to in subsection (1) shall 254 make available to the policyholder as part of the application, 255 for an appropriate additional premium, the coverage required in 256 this section without such coverage being subject to the 257 deductible or coinsurance provisions of the policy. 258 Section 3.âPresent subsection (17) of section 627.6699, 259 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (18), and a new 260 subsection (17) is added to that section, to read: 261 627.6699âEmployee Health Care Access Act.â 262 (17)âCOVERAGE FOR MAMMOGRAMS.â 263 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 264 1.ââBI-RADSâ means the American College of Radiology Breast 265 Imaging Reporting and Data System. 266 2.ââDiagnostic breast examinationâ means a medically 267 necessary imaging examination of the breast, including, but not 268 limited to, an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast 269 magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, which is used 270 to evaluate an abnormality that is seen or reasonably suspected 271 during a screening examination for breast cancer. For purposes 272 of this subparagraph, the term âreasonably suspectedâ means the 273 screening examination evidences at least one observable sign of 274 a potential abnormality. 275 3.ââIncreased riskâ means, in accordance with the National 276 Comprehensive Cancer Network, any one of the following 277 categories which enhances the likelihood that a woman may 278 develop breast cancer, including: 279 a.âHaving a known genetic predisposition or a pedigree 280 suggestive of a genetic predisposition for breast cancer. 281 b.âHaving a lifetime risk of breast cancer equal to or 282 greater than 20 percent as defined by models that include a 283 comprehensive family history, including first-, second-, and, 284 when relevant to the model, third-degree relatives. 285 c.âHaving previously received thoracic radiation between 10 286 and 30 years of age. 287 d.âBeing 35 years of age or older with a 5-year risk of 288 invasive breast cancer equal to or greater than 1.7 percent. 289 e.âHaving a lifetime risk equal to or greater than 20 290 percent based on a history of atypical ductal hyperplasia, 291 lobular carcinoma in situ, or atypical lobular hyperplasia. 292 f.âHaving heterogeneously or extremely dense breast tissue 293 as defined under the BI-RADS and based on a womanâs most 294 recently completed mammogram results. 295 4.ââScreening mammogramâ means a radiologic examination 296 using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 297 including digital breast tomosynthesis mammography but not 298 including any diagnostic mammography imaging, for the purpose of 299 detecting any potential breast cancer, which examination results 300 in the production of at least two radiographic images of each 301 breast. 302 5.ââSupplemental breast cancer screeningâ means an imaging 303 examination of the breast, including, but not limited to, breast 304 magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, contrast-enhanced 305 mammography, or molecular breast imaging, which is used to 306 screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or 307 suspected. 308 (b)âA health benefit plan issued in this state on or after 309 January 1, 2027, must provide for all of the following minimum 310 coverage in accordance with the most recent applicable National 311 Comprehensive Cancer Networkâs Breast Cancer Screening and 312 Diagnosis guidelines: 313 1.âA screening mammogram every year for any woman who is 40 314 years of age or older. 315 2.âOne or more medically necessary screening mammograms a 316 year, based upon a recommendation of a physician licensed under 317 chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is at an increased 318 risk of developing breast cancer. 319 3.âOne medically necessary supplemental breast cancer 320 screening a year, based upon a recommendation of a physician 321 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is 322 at an increased risk of developing breast cancer. 323 (c)âA health benefit plan issued for an insured who has 324 dense breast tissue by itself in the absence of any evidence of 325 an abnormality or suspicious abnormality of the breast as 326 defined by BI-RADS is subject to the coverage requirements 327 provided in subparagraphs (b)2. and 3. 328 (d)âA health benefit plan is subject to this section after 329 treatment for any breast cancer is completed, even if the 330 insured is in a remission and surveillance period prior to any 331 clinical designation that the insured is in long-term remission 332 or cured provided any examination conducted during such period 333 does not meet the definition of a diagnostic breast examination. 334 (e)âThe coverage required by subparagraphs (b)2. and 3. 335 applies, with or without a licensed treating physicianâs 336 prescription, if the insured obtains a screening mammogram in an 337 office, facility, or health testing service that uses 338 radiological equipment registered with the Department of Health 339 for breast cancer screening. The coverage is subject to the 340 deductible and coinsurance provisions applicable to outpatient 341 visits and is also subject to all other terms and conditions 342 applicable to other benefits. This section does not affect any 343 requirements or prohibitions relating to who may perform, 344 analyze, or interpret a screening mammogram or the persons to 345 whom the results of a screening mammogram may be furnished or 346 released. 347 (f)âThis subsection applies to policies providing health 348 benefit plan coverage or benefits. 349 (g)âEvery insurer subject to the requirements of this 350 subsection shall make available to the policyholder or contract 351 holder as part of the application, for an appropriate additional 352 premium, the coverage required in this subsection without such 353 coverage being subject to the deductible or coinsurance 354 provisions of the policy. 355 Section 4.âSection 641.31095, Florida Statutes, is amended 356 to read: 357 641.31095âCoverage for mammograms.â 358 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 359 (a)ââBI-RADSâ means the American College of Radiology 360 Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System. 361 (b)ââDiagnostic breast examinationâ means a medically 362 necessary imaging examination of the breast, including, but not 363 limited to, an examination using diagnostic mammography, breast 364 magnetic resonance imaging, or breast ultrasound, which is used 365 to evaluate an abnormality that is seen or reasonably suspected 366 during a screening examination for breast cancer. For purposes 367 of this paragraph, the term âreasonably suspectedâ means the 368 screening examination evidences at least one observable sign of 369 a potential abnormality. 370 (c)ââIncreased riskâ means, in accordance with the National 371 Comprehensive Cancer Network, any one of the following 372 categories which enhances the likelihood that a woman may 373 develop breast cancer, including: 374 1.âHaving a known genetic predisposition or a pedigree 375 suggestive of a genetic predisposition for breast cancer. 376 2.âHaving a lifetime risk of breast cancer equal to or 377 greater than 20 percent as defined by models that include a 378 comprehensive family history, including first-, second-, and, 379 when relevant to the model, third-degree relatives. 380 3.âHaving previously received thoracic radiation between 10 381 and 30 years of age. 382 4.âBeing 35 years of age or older with a 5-year risk of 383 invasive breast cancer equal to or greater than 1.7 percent. 384 5.âHaving a lifetime risk equal to or greater than 20 385 percent based on a history of atypical ductal hyperplasia, 386 lobular carcinoma in situ, or atypical lobular hyperplasia. 387 6.âHaving heterogeneously or extremely dense breast tissue 388 as defined under the BI-RADS and based on a womanâs most 389 recently completed mammogram results. 390 (d)ââScreening mammogramâ means a radiologic examination 391 using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 392 including digital breast tomosynthesis mammography but not 393 including any diagnostic mammography imaging, for the purpose of 394 detecting any potential breast cancer, which examination results 395 in the production of at least two radiographic images of each 396 breast. 397 (e)ââSupplemental breast cancer screeningâ means an imaging 398 examination of the breast, including, but not limited to, breast 399 magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, contrast-enhanced 400 mammography, or molecular breast imaging, which is used to 401 screen for breast cancer when there is no abnormality seen or 402 suspected. 403 (2)(1)âEvery health maintenance contract issued or renewed 404 on or after January 1, 2027 1996, shall provide for all of the 405 following minimum coverage in accordance with the most recent 406 applicable National Comprehensive Cancer Networkâs Breast Cancer 407 Screening and Diagnosis guidelines coverage for at least the 408 following: 409 (a)âA baseline mammogram for any woman who is 35 years of 410 age or older, but younger than 40 years of age. 411 (b)âA mammogram every 2 years for any woman who is 40 years 412 of age or older, but younger than 50 years of age, or more 413 frequently based on the patientâs physicianâs recommendations. 414 (c)âA screening mammogram every year for any woman who is 415 40 50 years of age or older. 416 (b)(d)âOne or more medically necessary screening mammograms 417 and one supplemental breast cancer screening mammograms a year, 418 based upon a physicianâs recommendation of a physician licensed 419 under chapter 458 or chapter 459, for any woman who is at an 420 increased risk of developing for breast cancer because of a 421 personal or family history of breast cancer, because of having a 422 history of biopsy-proven benign breast disease, because of 423 having a mother, sister, or daughter who has had breast cancer, 424 or because a woman has not given birth before the age of 30. 425 (3)âA health maintenance contract issued for a member who 426 has dense breast tissue by itself in the absence of any evidence 427 of an abnormality or suspicious abnormality of the breast as 428 defined by BI-RADS is subject to the coverage requirements 429 provided in paragraph (2)(b). 430 (4)âA health maintenance contract is subject to this 431 section after treatment for any breast cancer is completed even 432 if the member is in a remission and surveillance period prior to 433 any clinical designation that the member is in long-term 434 remission or cured, provided any examination conducted during 435 such period does not meet the definition of a diagnostic breast 436 examination. 437 (5)(2)âThe coverage required by this section is subject to 438 the deductible and copayment provisions applicable to outpatient 439 visits, and is also subject to all other terms and conditions 440 applicable to other benefits. A health maintenance organization 441 shall make available to the subscriber as part of the 442 application, for an appropriate additional premium, the coverage 443 required in this section without such coverage being subject to 444 any deductible or copayment provisions in the contract. 445 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.